Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1695.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1272, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1272.


UNLAWFUL CARRY


A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be


unlawful for any person to carry upon or about his or her person, or


in a purse or other container belonging to the person, any pistol,


revolver, shotgun or rifle whether loaded or unloaded or any


blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, metal knuckles, or any other


offensive weapon, whether such weapon be concealed or unconcealed,


except this section shall not prohibit:


1. The proper use of guns and knives for self-defense, hunting,


fishing, educational or recreational purposes;

Req. No. 3155 Page 1


2. The carrying or use of weapons in a manner otherwise


permitted by statute or authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act;


3. The carrying, possession and use of any weapon by a peace


officer or other person authorized by law to carry a weapon in the


performance of official duties and in compliance with the rules of


the employing agency;


4. The carrying or use of weapons in a courthouse by a district


judge, associate district judge or special district judge within


this state, who is in possession of a valid handgun license issued


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and


whose name appears on a list maintained by the Administrative


Director of the Courts;


5. The carrying and use of firearms and other weapons provided


in this subsection when used for the purpose of living history


reenactment. For purposes of this paragraph, “living history


reenactment” means depiction of historical characters, scenes,


historical life or events for entertainment, education, or


historical documentation through the wearing or use of period,


historical, antique or vintage clothing, accessories, firearms,


weapons, and other implements of the historical period; or


6. The transporting by vehicle on a public roadway or the


carrying of a firearm, concealed or unconcealed, loaded or unloaded,


by a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older or by a


person who is eighteen (18) years of age but not yet twenty-one (21)

Req. No. 3155 Page 2


years of age and the person is a member or veteran of the United


States Armed Forces, Reserves or National Guard or was discharged


under honorable conditions from the United States Armed Forces,


Reserves or National Guard, and the person is otherwise not


disqualified from the possession or purchase of a firearm under


state or federal law and is not carrying the firearm in furtherance


of a crime; or


7. The public carry, transport, or handling of a firearm in


public if the chamber is empty and shall not be considered felony


pointing of a firearm pursuant to Section 1289.16 of this title.


Except as provided in subsection B of Section 1283 of this


title, a person who has been convicted of any one of the following


offenses in this state or a violation of the equivalent law of


another state:


a. assault and battery pursuant to the provisions of


Section 644 of this title which caused serious


physical injury to the victim,


b. aggravated assault and battery pursuant to the


provisions of Section 646 of this title,


c. assault and battery that qualifies as domestic abuse


as defined in Section 644 of this title,


d. stalking pursuant to the provisions of Section 1173 of


this title,



Req. No. 3155 Page 3


e. a violation of an order issued under the Protection


from Domestic Abuse Act or a domestic abuse protection


order issued by another state, or


f. a violation relating to illegal drug use or possession


under the provisions of the Uniform Controlled


Dangerous Substances Act,


shall be prohibited from carrying a firearm under the provisions of


this paragraph. Any person who carries a firearm in the manner


provided for in this paragraph shall be prohibited from carrying the


firearm into any of the places prohibited in subsection A of Section


1277 of this title or any other place currently prohibited by law.


Nothing in this section shall modify or otherwise change where a


person may legally carry a firearm.


B. Any person convicted of violating the foregoing provision


shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section


1276 of this title.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3155 CN 1/14/2026 10:14:18 AM











Req. No. 3155 Page 4